Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 652.260 is amended to read:
652.260. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Home health care staff” means individuals who  provide home health services. “Home
health care staff” does not include:
(A) Home care workers, as defined in ORS 410.600;
(B) Direct caregivers employed by an in-home care agency as defined in ORS 443.305;
(C) Physicians;
(D) Nurse practitioners;
(E) Psychiatrists;
(F) Psychologists;
(G) Volunteers; or
(H) Individuals classified as a supervisor under an applicable collective bargaining
agreement or certified  as a supervisor by the National Labor Relations Board or the Em-
ployment Relations Board.
(b) “Home health services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.014.
(c) “Home hospice care staff” means individuals who  provide home hospice services.
“Home hospice care staff” does not include:
(A) Home care workers, as defined in ORS 410.600;
(B) Direct caregivers employed by an in-home care agency as defined in ORS 443.305;
(C) Physicians;
(D) Nurse practitioners;
(E) Psychiatrists;
(F) Psychologists;
(G) Volunteers; or
(H) Individuals classified as a supervisor under an applicable collective bargaining
agreement or certified as a supervisor by the National Labor Relations Board or  the Em-
ployment Relations Board.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1168 (SB 1168-B) Page 1
(d) “Home hospice services” means hospice services that are furnished to  an individual
by home hospice care staff in a place of temporary or permanent residence used as  the
individual’s home for the purpose of maintaining that individual at home.
(e) “Hospice services” has the meaning given that term in ORS 443.850.
(f) “Term or condition  of employment” includes bonuses, productivity-based pay raises
and disciplinary procedures.
[(1)] (2) A home  health agency providing home health services may not compensate [ a nurse ]
home health care staff providing home health services for the agency on a per-visit basis.
[(2)] (3) A hospice program providing hospice services may not compensate [ a nurse ] home
hospice care staff  providing hospice services for the program on a per-visit basis.
(4) For purposes of this section, compensation shall be considered to be on  a per-visit
basis if paid in connection with any term or condition of employment that is directly or  in-
directly related to or based in whole or in part on:
(a) The total number of patients served by a home health care staff  person or a home
hospice care staff person; or
(b) The number of visits made to patients by a home health care staff person or a home
hospice care staff person.
[(3)(a)] (5)(a) The Bureau of Labor and Industries shall enforce  compliance with the provisions
of this section.
(b) In accordance with the provisions  of ORS chapter 183, the Commissioner of the Bureau of
Labor and Industries may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Bureau of Labor and  Industries by section 1, chapter _____, Oregon Laws 2025
(Enrolled House Bill 5015), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, is increased by $159,362,
to enforce  compliance with the provisions under section 1 of this 2025 Act prohibiting per-
visit compensation for home health care staff and home hospice care staff.
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1168 (SB 1168-B) Page 2